New Jersey, session 221, A4858.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  (New section)   a. A taxpayer that is a manufacturer of equipment and components for advanced nuclear facilities licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), in an amount equal to 15 percent of the amount paid during the privilege period for: (1)  new manufacturing equipment installed at a new or existing manufacturing facility located within the State; and (2)  the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, installation, or erection of improvements or additions that result in the renovation, modernization, or expansion of a manufacturing facility located within the State. b.    If a taxpayer relocates its business operations to this State from another state within six months prior to the taxpayers initial application for the credit, the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section shall increase to 25 percent of the amount paid for each of the first three privilege periods for which the taxpayer is eligible to receive the credit. A taxpayer that qualifies for an increased credit pursuant to this subsection shall not be eligible for an increased credit pursuant to subsection c. of this section. c.    If a taxpayer is certified by the State as a "minority business" or a "women's business" pursuant to P.L.1986, c.195 (C.52:27H-21.17 et seq.) or qualifies as a "veteran-owned business" pursuant to P.L.2011, c.147 (C.52:32-50 et seq.), the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section shall increase to 25 percent of the amount paid during the privilege period.  A taxpayer that qualifies for an increased credit pursuant to this subsection shall not be eligible for an increased credit pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d.    A credit shall not be allowed under P.L.1993, c.170 (C.54:10A-5.4 et seq.), P.L.1993, c.171 (C.54:10A-5.16 et al.), P.L.1993, c.175 (C.54:10A-5.24), or P.L.2001, c.321 (C.54:10A-5.31 et seq.) for expenditures for which a credit is allowed pursuant to this section. e.    The order of the application of the credits allowed under this section and any other credits allowed by law shall be based on the order in which completed applications are received by the Department of the Treasury.  The amount of the credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period, together with any other credits allowed against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), shall not exceed 50 percent of the tax liability otherwise due and shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). f.     An unused credit may be carried forward, if necessary, for use in the seven privilege periods following the privilege period for which the credit is allowed. g.    As used in this section: "Manufacturing equipment" means machinery, apparatus, or equipment used in the production of equipment and components for advanced nuclear reactors licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission. "Manufacturing facility" means a business location, including, but not limited to, a factory, mill, or plant, at which more than 50 percent of the business personal property that is housed in the facility is manufacturing equipment. 2.  (New section)   a.  The New Jersey Advanced Nuclear Energy Development Program is hereby established as a program under the jurisdiction of the New Jersey Economic Development Authority.  The authority, in consultation with the Board of Public Utilities, shall administer the program to encourage the construction of advanced nuclear energy facilities in the State through the provision of incentive tax credit awards to developers for the construction of facilities and production of energy at those facilities upon completion.  The board may approve the award of tax credits to a developer upon application to the authority. b.    A developer shall be eligible to receive an incentive tax credit for a facility project only if the developer demonstrates to the authority at the time of the application that: (1)  without the incentive tax credit, the facility project is not economically feasible; (2)  a project financing gap exists, or the authority determines that the facility project will generate a below market rate of return; (3)  the facility project is located at a current or decommissioned commercial nuclear generating facility in the State with a license that is or was previously issued by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission; (4)  except for demolition and site remediation activities, the developer has not commenced any construction at the site of the facility project prior to submitting an application, unless the authority determines that the facility project would not be completed otherwise or, in the event the facility project is to be undertaken in phases, the requested incentive tax credit is limited to only phases for which construction has not yet commenced; (5) the facility project shall comply with minimum environmental and sustainability standards; (6) the facility project shall comply with the authoritys affirmative action requirements, adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.4); (7) during the eligibility period, each worker employed to perform construction work or building services work at the facility project shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the workers craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and P.L.2005, c.379 (C.34:11-56.58 et seq.); (8)  the developer intends to initiate the process for acquisition of a license for the construction of an advanced nuclear reactor with the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission by the end of calendar year 2023 and be issued an operator license for the facility by 2030; and (9)  the developer has complied with all requirements for filing tax and information returns and for paying or remitting required State taxes and fees by submitting, as a part of the application, a tax clearance certificate, as described in section 1 of P.L.2007, c.101 (C.54:50-39). In addition to the requirements set forth in this subsection, for a facility project to qualify for an incentive tax credit the developer shall contribute capital of at least 20 percent of the total project cost. c.    (1)  For a facility project eligible pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the developer shall submit an application to the authority in a form an manner prescribed in regulations adopted by the authority pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). The authority shall accept applications for incentive tax credits during the grant periods established pursuant to subsection d. of this section. (2)  The authority shall not consider an application for the advanced nuclear facility unless the developer submits a letter evidencing support for the project from the governing body of the municipality in which the commercial project is located with the application. (3)  The authority shall review the project cost, evaluate and validate the project financing gap estimated by the developer, and conduct a State fiscal impact analysis to ensure that the overall public assistance provided to the project will result in a net positive benefit to the State.  In determining whether a project will result in a net positive benefit to the State, the authority shall not consider the value of any taxes exempted, abated, rebated, or retained under the Five-Year Exemption and Abatement Law, P.L.1991, c.441 (C.40A:21-1 et seq.), the Long Term Tax Exemption Law, P.L.1991, c.431 (C.40A:20-1 et al.), the New Jersey Urban Enterprise Zones Act, P.L.1983, c.303 (C.52:27H-60 et seq.), or any other law that has the effect of lowering or eliminating the developers State or local tax liability. The determination made pursuant to this subsection shall be based on the potential tax liability of the developer without regard for potential tax losses if the developer were to locate in another state. The authority shall assess the cost of these reviews to the applicant. A developer shall pay to the authority the full amount of the direct costs of an analysis concerning the developers application for a tax credit that a third party retained by the authority performs, if the authority deems such retention to be necessary. The authority shall evaluate the net economic benefits on a present value basis under which the requested tax credit allocation amount is discounted to present value at the same discount rate as the projected benefits from the implementation of the proposed facility project for which an award of tax credits is being sought. (4)  For a facility project subject to the requirement of paragraph 3 of subsection c. of this section to be eligible for any tax credits under the program, a developer shall demonstrate to the authority that the award of tax credits will yield a net positive benefit to the State equaling an amount determined by the authority through regulation that exceeds the requested tax credit amount. The developer shall certify, under the penalty of perjury, that all documents submitted, and factual assertions made, to the authority to demonstrate that the award of tax credits will yield a net positive benefit to the State in accordance with this subsection are true and accurate at the time of submission. (5)  If at any time during the eligibility period the authority determines that the developer made a material misrepresentation on the developers application, the developer shall forfeit the incentive tax credit award. (6)  If circumstances require a developer to amend its application to the authority, then the developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify to the authority that the information provided in its amended application is true under the penalty of perjury. d.    (1)  For the facility project eligible pursuant to subsection b. of this section, the authority shall award the incentive tax credit based on the order in which complete, qualifying applications were received by the authority. (2)  Prior to allocating an incentive tax credit award to the facility project, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury that the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or a developer not in substantial good standing with each department has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan for the developer, and that the developer shall confirm that each contractor or subcontractor performing work at the facility project: (1) is registered as required by The Public Works Contractor Registration Act, P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.); (2) has not been debarred by Department of Labor and Workforce Development from engaging in or bidding on Public Works Contracts in the State; and (3) possesses a tax clearance certificate issued by the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. The authority may also contract with an independent third party to perform a background check on the developer. Provided that the developer, and all contractors and subcontractors, are in compliance with this subsection, the authority shall allocate incentive tax credit to the facility project according to the facility projects score and until either the available incentive tax credits are exhausted. If insufficient funding exists to fully fund the facility project, the project may be offered partial funding. e.  (1)  Following approval and selection of an application pursuant to subsections c. and d. of this section, the authority shall enter into an incentive tax credit award agreement with the developer. The chief executive officer of the authority shall negotiate the terms and conditions of the incentive tax credit award agreement on behalf of the State.  For a phased project, the incentive tax credit award agreement shall set forth, for each phase of the project and for the total project, the capital investment requirements and the time periods in which each phase of the project shall be commenced and completed. The awarding of tax credits shall be conditioned on the developers compliance with the requirements of the agreement. (2)  An incentive tax credit award agreement shall also specify that the amount of the credit shall be $1 million for each megawatt of energy produced by the facility upon completion and the duration of the eligibility period, which shall not exceed 20 years.  The incentive tax credit award agreement shall provide an estimated date of completion and include a requirement for periodic progress reports, including the submittal of executed financing commitments and documents that evidence site control. If the authority does not receive periodic progress reports, or if the progress reports demonstrate unsatisfactory progress, then the authority may rescind the incentive tax credit. If the authority rescinds an incentive tax credit in the same calendar year in which the authority approved the incentive tax credit award, then the authority may assign the incentive tax credit to another applicant. The incentive tax credit award agreement may also provide for a verification of the financing gap at the time the developer provides executed financing commitments to the authority and a verification of the developers projected cash flow at the time of certification that the project is completed. Upon completion of construction of the project, the incentive tax credit award agreement shall provide for the distribution of a portion of the incentive tax credit in $1 million increments for each megawatt of energy produced by the facility. (3)  To ensure the protection of taxpayer money, if the authority determines at project certification that the actual capital financing approach utilized by the project has resulted in a financing gap that is smaller than the financing gap determined at board approval, the authority shall reduce the amount of the tax credit or accept payment from the developer on a pro rata basis. If there is no project financing gap due to the actual capital financing approach utilized by the project, then the developer shall forfeit the incentive tax credit. At the end of the seventh year of the eligibility period, the authority shall evaluate the developers rate of return on investment and compare that rate of return on investment to the reasonable and appropriate rate of return at the time of board approval. If the actual rate of return on investment exceeds the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment at the time of board approval by more than 15 percent, the authority shall require the developer to pay up to 20 percent of the amount in excess of the reasonable and appropriate rate of return on investment. The authority shall require an escrow account to be held by the authority until the end of the eligibility period. Following the final year of the eligibility period, the authority shall determine if the developers rate of return exceeded the reasonable and appropriate rate of return determined at board approval. If the final rate of return does not exceed the reasonable and appropriate rate of return determined at board approval, the authority shall release to the developer the escrowed funds. If the project final rate of return exceeds the reasonable and appropriate rate of return determined at board approval, the authority shall require the developer to pay up to 20 percent of the amount of the excess, which shall include the funds held in escrow, and such funds shall be deposited in the State General Fund. (4)  The incentive tax credit award agreement shall also include a provision that the developer shall forfeit the incentive tax credit in any year in which the developer is found by the authority to not be in substantial good standing with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury or has entered into a practical corrective action plan. The incentive tax credit award agreement shall also require a developer to engage in on-site consultations with the Division of Workplace Safety and Health in the Department of Health. (5)  A developer shall submit, prior to the first disbursement of tax credits under the incentive tax credit agreement, but no later than six months following project completion, satisfactory evidence of actual project costs, as certified by a certified public accountant, evidence of project completion that begins during the eligibility period indicated in the incentive tax credit agreement. The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify that the information provided pursuant to this subsection is true under the penalty of perjury. Claims, records, or statements submitted by a developer to the authority in order to receive tax credits shall not be considered claims, records, or statements made in connection with State tax laws. (6)  The incentive tax credit award agreement shall include a provision allowing the authority to extend, in individual cases, the deadline for any annual reporting or certification requirement. f.  (1)  A developer approved for an incentive tax credit pursuant to subsections b. and c. of this section and that enters an incentive tax credit award agreement pursuant to subsection e. of this section shall submit annually, commencing in the year in which the incentive tax credit is issued and for the remainder of the eligibility period, a report indicating whether the developer is aware of any condition, event, or act that would cause the developer not to be in compliance with the incentive tax credit award agreement or the provisions of this section and any additional reporting requirements contained in the incentive tax credit award agreement or tax credit certificate. The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify that the information provided pursuant to this subsection is true under the penalty of perjury. (2)  Upon receipt and review of each report submitted during the eligibility period, the authority shall provide to the developer and the director a certificate of compliance indicating the amount of tax credits that the developer may apply against the developers tax liability.  Upon receipt by the director of the certificate of compliance, the director shall allow the developer a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). A developer shall apply the credit awarded against the developers liability under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5 for the privilege period during which the director allows the developer a tax credit pursuant to this subsection. A developer shall not carry forward an unused credit unless the developer was unable to use the credit because the developers facility project was directly impacted due to a natural disaster, state emergency, national emergency, or a situation that was out of the developers control that impacted the developers use of the credit that year, in which case the developer is permitted to carry forward an unused credit for up to two years upon submitting evidence of the developers facility project being directly impacted by such a circumstance and receiving approval from the authority. Credits granted to a partnership shall be passed through to the partners, members, or owners, respectively, pro-rata, or pursuant to an executed agreement among the partners, members, or owners documenting an alternate distribution method provided to the director accompanied by any additional information as the director may prescribe. The director shall prescribe the order of priority of the application of the credit allowed under this section and any other credits allowed by law against the tax imposed under section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). The amount of the credit applied under this section against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5) for a privilege period, together with any other credits allowed by law, shall not reduce the tax liability to an amount less than the statutory minimum provided in subsection (e) of section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5). g.    (1)  A developer may apply to the director and the chief executive officer of the authority for an incentive tax credit transfer certificate, covering one or more years, in lieu of the developer being allowed any amount of the credit against the tax liability of the developer. The incentive tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the developer from the director and the chief executive officer of the authority, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part in an amount not less than $25,000, in the privilege period during which the developer receives the incentive tax credit transfer certificate from the director, to another person, who may apply the credit against a tax liability pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5. The certificate provided to the developer shall include a statement waiving the developers right to claim the amount of the credit that the developer has elected to sell or assign against the developers tax liability. (2)  The developer shall not sell or assign, including a collateral assignment, an incentive tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this section for consideration received by the developer of less than 85 percent of the transferred credit amount before considering any further discounting to present value which shall be permitted. (3)  A purchaser or assignee of an incentive tax credit transfer certificate pursuant to this section shall not make any subsequent transfers, assignments, or sales of the tax credit transfer certificate. (4)  The authority shall publish on its Internet website the following information concerning each incentive tax credit transfer certificate approved by the authority and the director pursuant to this section: the name of the transferrer; the name of the transferee; the value of the tax credit transfer certificate; and the consideration received by the transferrer. h.  (1)  A developer who has entered into an incentive tax credit agreement pursuant to subsection e. of this section may, upon notice to and written consent of the authority and State Treasurer, pledge, assign, transfer, or sell any or all of its right, title, and interest in and to the incentive tax credit agreement and in the incentive tax credits under the incentive tax credit agreement, and the right to receive the incentive tax credits, along with the rights and remedies provided to the developer under the incentive tax credit agreement. Any assignment shall be an absolute assignment for all purposes, including the federal bankruptcy code. (2)  Any pledge of an incentive tax credit made by the developer shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made and filed in the records of the authority. The incentive tax credit pledged and thereafter received by the developer shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the developer irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof. As a condition of any incentive tax credit, the recipient, assignee, pledgee or subsequent holder of the incentive tax credit shall immediately file notice of the same with the clerk of the county in which the project is located. (3)  The authority shall publish on its Internet website the following information concerning each pledge, assignment, transfer, or sale approved by the authority pursuant to this section: the name of the person or entity offering the pledge, assignment, transfer, or sale of a right, title, or interest in an incentive tax credit agreement; the name of the person or entity receiving the pledge, assignment, transfer, or sale of a right, title, or interest in the incentive tax credit agreement; the value of the right, title, or interest in the incentive tax credit agreement; and the consideration received by the person or entity offering the pledge, assignment, transfer, or sale of the right, title, or interest in the incentive tax credit agreement. i.     Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to the contrary, the chief executive officer of the authority may adopt, immediately, upon filing with the Office of Administrative Law, regulations that the chief executive officer deems necessary to implement the provisions of this section which regulations shall be effective for a period not to exceed 180 days from the date of the filing. The chief executive officer shall thereafter amend, adopt, or readopt the regulations in accordance with the requirements of P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.). 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.): Advanced nuclear energy credit means the financial credit provided by the board to the first advanced nuclear energy facility operating in the State, on an annual basis for the first 25 years of facility operations, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). Advanced nuclear energy facility means a reactor, or a facility containing a reactor, that produces electricity through the use of nuclear fusion; or a reactor, or a facility containing a reactor, that produces electricity through the use of nuclear fission and incorporates generational improvements, with respect to coolants, fuels, neutron moderators, or other components used in the fission process, which enable the fission reactor to operate more safely, efficiently, or effectively, or to have a smaller footprint, than the Generation III, Generation III+, or earlier-generation nuclear fission reactors that are currently in operation in the State as of the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). "Assignee" means a person to which an electric public utility or another assignee assigns, sells, or transfers, other than as security, all or a portion of its right to or interest in bondable transition property.  Except as specifically provided in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), an assignee shall not be subject to the public utility requirements of Title 48 or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto. "Base load electric power generation facility" means an electric power generation facility intended to be operated at a greater than 50 percent capacity factor including, but not limited to, a combined cycle power facility and a combined heat and power facility. "Base residual auction" means the auction conducted by PJM, as part of PJM's reliability pricing model, three years prior to the start of the delivery year to secure electrical capacity as necessary to satisfy the capacity requirements for that delivery year. "Basic gas supply service" means gas supply service that is provided to any customer that has not chosen an alternative gas supplier, whether or not the customer has received offers as to competitive supply options, including, but not limited to, any customer that cannot obtain such service for any reason, including non-payment for services.  Basic gas supply service is not a competitive service and shall be fully regulated by the board. "Basic generation service" or "BGS" means electric generation service that is provided, to any customer that has not chosen an alternative electric power supplier, whether or not the customer has received offers for competitive supply options, including, but not limited to, any customer that cannot obtain such service from an electric power supplier for any reason, including non-payment for services.  Basic generation service is not a competitive service and shall be fully regulated by the board. "Basic generation service provider" or "provider" means a provider of basic generation service. "Basic generation service transition costs" means the amount by which the payments by an electric public utility for the procurement of power for basic generation service and related ancillary and administrative costs exceeds the net revenues from the basic generation service charge established by the board pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-57) during the transition period, together with interest on the balance at the board-approved rate, that is reflected in a deferred balance account approved by the board in an order addressing the electric public utility's unbundled rates, stranded costs, and restructuring filings pursuant to P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.).  Basic generation service transition costs shall include, but are not limited to, costs of purchases from the spot market, bilateral contracts, contracts with non-utility generators, parting contracts with the purchaser of the electric public utility's divested generation assets, short-term advance purchases, and financial instruments such as hedging, forward contracts, and options.  Basic generation service transition costs shall also include the payments by an electric public utility pursuant to a competitive procurement process for basic generation service supply during the transition period, and costs of any such process used to procure the basic generation service supply. "Board" means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. "Bondable stranded costs" means any stranded costs or basic generation service transition costs of an electric public utility approved by the board for recovery pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), together with, as approved by the board: (1) the cost of retiring existing debt or equity capital of the electric public utility, including accrued interest, premium and other fees, costs, and charges relating thereto, with the proceeds of the financing of bondable transition property; (2) if requested by an electric public utility in its application for a bondable stranded costs rate order, federal, State, and local tax liabilities associated with stranded costs recovery, basic generation service transition cost recovery, or the transfer or financing of the property, or both, including taxes, whose recovery period is modified by the effect of a stranded costs recovery order, a bondable stranded costs rate order, or both; and (3) the costs incurred to issue, service, or refinance transition bonds, including interest, acquisition, or redemption premium, and other financing costs, whether paid upon issuance or over the life of the transition bonds, including, but not limited to, credit enhancements, service charges, overcollateralization, interest rate cap, swap or collar, yield maintenance, maturity guarantee or other hedging agreements, equity investments, operating costs, and other related fees, costs, and charges, or to assign, sell, or otherwise transfer bondable transition property. "Bondable stranded costs rate order" means one or more irrevocable written orders issued by the board pursuant to P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) which determines the amount of bondable stranded costs and the initial amount of transition bond charges authorized to be imposed to recover the bondable stranded costs, including the costs to be financed from the proceeds of the transition bonds, as well as on-going costs associated with servicing and credit enhancing the transition bonds, and provides the electric public utility specific authority to issue or cause to be issued, directly or indirectly, transition bonds through a financing entity and related matters as provided in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), which order shall become effective immediately upon the written consent of the related electric public utility to the order as provided in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.). "Bondable transition property" means the property consisting of the irrevocable right to charge, collect, and receive, and be paid from collections of, transition bond charges in the amount necessary to provide for the full recovery of bondable stranded costs which are determined to be recoverable in a bondable stranded costs rate order, all rights of the related electric public utility under the bondable stranded costs rate order including, without limitation, all rights to obtain periodic adjustments of the related transition bond charges pursuant to subsection b. of section 15 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-64), and all revenues, collections, payments, money, and proceeds arising under, or with respect to, all of the foregoing. "British thermal unit" or "Btu" means the amount of heat required to increase the temperature of one pound of water by one degree Fahrenheit. "Broker" means a duly licensed electric power supplier that assumes the contractual and legal responsibility for the sale of electric generation service, transmission, or other services to end-use retail customers, but does not take title to any of the power sold, or a duly licensed gas supplier that assumes the contractual and legal obligation to provide gas supply service to end-use retail customers, but does not take title to the gas. "Brownfield" means any former or current commercial or industrial site that is currently vacant or underutilized and on which there has been, or there is suspected to have been, a discharge of a contaminant. "Buydown" means an arrangement or arrangements involving the buyer and seller in a given power purchase contract and, in some cases third parties, for consideration to be given by the buyer in order to effectuate a reduction in the pricing, or the restructuring of other terms to reduce the overall cost of the power contract, for the remaining succeeding period of the purchased power arrangement or arrangements. "Buyout" means an arrangement or arrangements involving the buyer and seller in a given power purchase contract and, in some cases third parties, for consideration to be given by the buyer in order to effectuate a termination of such power purchase contract. "Class I renewable energy" means electric energy produced from solar technologies, photovoltaic technologies, wind energy, fuel cells, geothermal technologies, wave or tidal action, small scale hydropower facilities with a capacity of three megawatts or less and put into service after the effective date of P.L.2012, c.24, methane gas from landfills, methane gas from a biomass facility provided that the biomass is cultivated and harvested in a sustainable manner, or methane gas from a composting or anaerobic or aerobic digestion facility that converts food waste or other organic waste to energy. "Class II renewable energy" means electric energy produced at a hydropower facility with a capacity of greater than three megawatts, but less than 30 megawatts, or a resource recovery facility, provided that the facility is located where retail competition is permitted and provided further that the Commissioner of Environmental Protection has determined that the facility meets the highest environmental standards and minimizes any impacts to the environment and local communities.  Class II renewable energy shall not include electric energy produced at a hydropower facility with a capacity of greater than 30 megawatts on or after the effective date of P.L.2015, c.51. "Co-generation" means the sequential production of electricity and steam or other forms of useful energy used for industrial or commercial heating and cooling purposes. "Combined cycle power facility" means a generation facility that combines two or more thermodynamic cycles, by producing electric power via the combustion of fuel and then routing the resulting waste heat by-product to a conventional boiler or to a heat recovery steam generator for use by a steam turbine to produce electric power, thereby increasing the overall efficiency of the generating facility. "Combined heat and power facility" or "co-generation facility" means a generation facility which produces electric energy and steam or other forms of useful energy such as heat, which are used for industrial or commercial heating or cooling purposes.  A combined heat and power facility or co-generation facility shall not be considered a public utility. "Competitive service" means any service offered by an electric public utility or a gas public utility that the board determines to be competitive pursuant to section 8 or section 10 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-56 or C.48:3-58) or that is not regulated by the board. "Commercial and industrial energy pricing class customer" or "CIEP class customer" means that group of non-residential customers with high peak demand, as determined by periodic board order, which either is eligible or which would be eligible, as determined by periodic board order, to receive funds from the Retail Margin Fund established pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-57) and for which basic generation service is hourly-priced. "Comprehensive resource analysis" means an analysis including, but not limited to, an assessment of existing market barriers to the implementation of energy efficiency and renewable technologies that are not or cannot be delivered to customers through a competitive marketplace. "Community solar facility" means a solar electric power generation facility participating in the Community Solar Energy Pilot Program or the Community Solar Energy Program developed by the board pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2018, c.17 (C.48:3-87.11). "Connected to the distribution system" means, for a solar electric power generation facility, that the facility is: (1) connected to a net metering customer's side of a meter, regardless of the voltage at which that customer connects to the electric grid; (2) an on-site generation facility; (3) qualified for net metering aggregation as provided pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection e. of section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87); (4) owned or operated by an electric public utility and approved by the board pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2007, c.340 (C.48:3-98.1); (5) directly connected to the electric grid at 69 kilovolts or less, regardless of how an electric public utility classifies that portion of its electric grid, and is designated as "connected to the distribution system" by the board pursuant to subsections q. through s. of section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87); or (6) is certified by the board, in consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, as being located on a brownfield, on an area of historic fill, or on a properly closed sanitary landfill facility.  Any solar electric power generation facility, other than that of a net metering customer on the customer's side of the meter, connected above 69 kilovolts shall not be considered connected to the distribution system. "Contaminated site or landfill" means: (1) any currently contaminated portion of a property on which industrial or commercial operations were conducted and a discharge occurred, and its associated disturbed areas, where "discharge" means the same as the term is defined in section 23 of P.L.1993, c.139 (C.58:10B-1); or (2) a properly closed sanitary landfill facility and its associated disturbed areas. "Customer" means any person that is an end user and is connected to any part of the transmission and distribution system within an electric public utility's service territory or a gas public utility's service territory within this State. "Customer account service" means metering, billing, or such other administrative activity associated with maintaining a customer account. "Delivery year" or "DY" means the 12-month period from June 1st through May 31st, numbered according to the calendar year in which it ends. "Demand side management" means the management of customer demand for energy service through the implementation of cost-effective energy efficiency technologies, including, but not limited to, installed conservation, load management, and energy efficiency measures on and in the residential, commercial, industrial, institutional, and governmental premises and facilities in this State. "Electric generation service" means the provision of retail electric energy and capacity which is generated off-site from the location at which the consumption of such electric energy and capacity is metered for retail billing purposes, including agreements and arrangements related thereto. "Electric power generator" means an entity that proposes to construct, own, lease, or operate, or currently owns, leases, or operates, an electric power production facility that will sell or does sell at least 90 percent of its output, either directly or through a marketer, to a customer or customers located at sites that are not on or contiguous to the site on which the facility will be located or is located.  The designation of an entity as an electric power generator for the purposes of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) shall not, in and of itself, affect the entity's status as an exempt wholesale generator under the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, 15 U.S.C. s.79 et seq., or its successor act. "Electric power supplier" means a person or entity that is duly licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) to offer and to assume the contractual and legal responsibility to provide electric generation service to retail customers, and includes load serving entities, marketers, and brokers that offer or provide electric generation service to retail customers.  The term excludes an electric public utility that provides electric generation service only as a basic generation service pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-57). "Electric public utility" means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within this State. "Electric related service" means a service that is directly related to the consumption of electricity by an end user, including, but not limited to, the installation of demand side management measures at the end user's premises, the maintenance, repair, or replacement of appliances, lighting, motors, or other energy-consuming devices at the end user's premises, and the provision of energy consumption measurement and billing services. "Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process, attached to, or logically associated with, a contract or other record, and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record. "Eligible generator" means a developer of a base load or mid-merit electric power generation facility including, but not limited to, an on-site generation facility that qualifies as a capacity resource under PJM criteria and that commences construction after the effective date of P.L.2011, c.9 (C.48:3-98.2 et al.). "Energy agent" means a person that is duly registered pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), that arranges the sale of retail electricity or electric related services, or retail gas supply or gas related services, between government aggregators or private aggregators and electric power suppliers or gas suppliers, but does not take title to the electric or gas sold. "Energy consumer" means a business or residential consumer of electric generation service or gas supply service located within the territorial jurisdiction of a government aggregator. "Energy efficiency portfolio standard" means a requirement to procure a specified amount of energy efficiency or demand side management resources as a means of managing and reducing energy usage and demand by customers. "Energy year" or "EY" means the 12-month period from June 1st through May 31st, numbered according to the calendar year in which it ends. "Existing business relationship" means a relationship formed by a voluntary two-way communication between an electric power supplier, gas supplier, broker, energy agent, marketer, private aggregator, sales representative, or telemarketer and a customer, regardless of an exchange of consideration, on the basis of an inquiry, application, purchase, or transaction initiated by the customer regarding products or services offered by the electric power supplier, gas supplier, broker, energy agent, marketer, private aggregator, sales representative, or telemarketer; however, a consumer's use of electric generation service or gas supply service through the consumer's electric public utility or gas public utility shall not constitute or establish an existing business relationship for the purpose of P.L.2013, c.263. "Farmland" means land actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use that is valued, assessed, and taxed pursuant to the "Farmland Assessment Act of 1964," P.L.1964, c.48 (C.54:4-23.1 et seq.). "Federal Energy Regulatory Commission" or "FERC" means the federal agency established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.7171 et seq. to regulate the interstate transmission of electricity, natural gas, and oil. "Final remediation document" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11b). "Financing entity" means an electric public utility, a special purpose entity, or any other assignee of bondable transition property, which issues transition bonds. Except as specifically provided in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), a financing entity which is not itself an electric public utility shall not be subject to the public utility requirements of Title 48 of the Revised Statutes or any rules or regulations adopted pursuant thereto. "Gas public utility" means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users within this State. "Gas related service" means a service that is directly related to the consumption of gas by an end user, including, but not limited to, the installation of demand side management measures at the end user's premises, the maintenance, repair or replacement of appliances or other energy-consuming devices at the end user's premises, and the provision of energy consumption measurement and billing services. "Gas supplier" means a person that is duly licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) to offer and assume the contractual and legal obligation to provide gas supply service to retail customers, and includes, but is not limited to, marketers and brokers. A non-public utility affiliate of a public utility holding company may be a gas supplier, but a gas public utility or any subsidiary of a gas utility is not a gas supplier.  In the event that a gas public utility is not part of a holding company legal structure, a related competitive business segment of that gas public utility may be a gas supplier, provided that related competitive business segment is structurally separated from the gas public utility, and provided that the interactions between the gas public utility and the related competitive business segment are subject to the affiliate relations standards adopted by the board pursuant to subsection k. of section 10 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-58). "Gas supply service" means the provision to customers of the retail commodity of gas, but does not include any regulated distribution service. "Government aggregator" means any government entity subject to the requirements of the "Local Public Contracts Law," P.L.1971, c.198 (C.40A:11-1 et seq.), the "Public School Contracts Law," N.J.S.18A:18A-1 et seq., or the "County College Contracts Law," P.L.1982, c.189 (C.18A:64A-25.1 et seq.), that enters into a written contract with a licensed electric power supplier or a licensed gas supplier for: (1) the provision of electric generation service, electric related service, gas supply service, or gas related service for its own use or the use of other government aggregators; or (2) if a municipal or county government, the provision of electric generation service or gas supply service on behalf of business or residential customers within its territorial jurisdiction. "Government energy aggregation program" means a program and procedure pursuant to which a government aggregator enters into a written contract for the provision of electric generation service or gas supply service on behalf of business or residential customers within its territorial jurisdiction. "Governmental entity" means any federal, state, municipal, local, or other governmental department, commission, board, agency, court, authority, or instrumentality having competent jurisdiction. "Green Acres program" means the program for the acquisition of lands for recreation and conservation purposes pursuant to P.L.1961, c.45 (C.13:8A-1 et seq.), P.L.1971, c.419 (C.13:8A-19 et seq.), P.L.1975, c.155 (C.13:8A-35 et seq.), any Green Acres bond act, P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-1 et seq.), and P.L.2016, c.12 (C.13:8C-43 et seq.). "Greenhouse gas emissions portfolio standard" means a requirement that addresses or limits the amount of carbon dioxide emissions indirectly resulting from the use of electricity as applied to any electric power suppliers and basic generation service providers of electricity. "Grid supply solar facility" means a solar electric power generation facility that sells electricity at wholesale and is connected to the State's electric distribution or transmission systems.  "Grid supply solar facility" does not include: (1) a net metered solar facility; (2) an on-site generation facility; (3) a facility participating in net metering aggregation pursuant to section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87); (4) a facility participating in remote net metering; or (5) a community solar facility. "Historic fill" means generally large volumes of non-indigenous material, no matter what date they were emplaced on the site, used to raise the topographic elevation of a site, which were contaminated prior to emplacement and are in no way connected with the operations at the location of emplacement and which include, but are not limited to, construction debris, dredge spoils, incinerator residue, demolition debris, fly ash, and non-hazardous solid waste.  "Historic fill" shall not include any material which is substantially chromate chemical production waste or any other chemical production waste or waste from processing of metal or mineral ores, residues, slags, or tailings. "Incremental auction" means an auction conducted by PJM, as part of PJM's reliability pricing model, prior to the start of the delivery year to secure electric capacity as necessary to satisfy the capacity requirements for that delivery year, that is not otherwise provided for in the base residual auction. "Leakage" means an increase in greenhouse gas emissions related to generation sources located outside of the State that are not subject to a state, interstate, or regional greenhouse gas emissions cap or standard that applies to generation sources located within the State. "Locational deliverability area" or "LDA" means one or more of the zones within the PJM region which are used to evaluate area transmission constraints and reliability issues including electric public utility company zones, sub-zones, and combinations of zones. "Long-term capacity agreement pilot program" or "LCAPP" means a pilot program established by the board that includes participation by eligible generators, to seek offers for financially-settled standard offer capacity agreements with eligible generators pursuant to the provisions of P.L.2011, c.9 (C.48:3-98.2 et al.). "Market transition charge" means a charge imposed pursuant to section 13 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-61) by an electric public utility, at a level determined by the board, on the electric public utility customers for a limited duration transition period to recover stranded costs created as a result of the introduction of electric power supply competition pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.). "Marketer" means a duly licensed electric power supplier that takes title to electric energy and capacity, transmission, and other services from electric power generators and other wholesale suppliers and then assumes the contractual and legal obligation to provide electric generation service, and may include transmission and other services, to an end-use retail customer or customers, or a duly licensed gas supplier that takes title to gas and then assumes the contractual and legal obligation to provide gas supply service to an end-use customer or customers. "Mid-merit electric power generation facility" means a generation facility that operates at a capacity factor between baseload generation facilities and peaker generation facilities. "Net metered solar facility" means a solar electric power generation facility participating in the net metering program developed by the board pursuant to subsection e. of section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87) or in a substantially similar program operated by a utility owned or operated by a local government unit. "Net metering aggregation" means a procedure for calculating the combination of the annual energy usage for all facilities owned by a single customer where such customer is a State entity, school district, county, county agency, county authority, municipality, municipal agency, or municipal authority, and which are served by a solar electric power generating facility as provided pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection e. of section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87). "Net proceeds" means proceeds less transaction and other related costs as determined by the board. "Net revenues" means revenues less related expenses, including applicable taxes, as determined by the board. "Offshore wind energy" means electric energy produced by a qualified offshore wind project. "Offshore wind renewable energy certificate" or "OREC" means a certificate, issued by the board or its designee, representing the e environmental attributes of one megawatt hour of electric generation from a qualified offshore wind project. "Off-site end use thermal energy services customer" means an end use customer that purchases thermal energy services from an on-site generation facility, combined heat and power facility, or co-generation facility, and that is located on property that is separated from the property on which the on-site generation facility, combined heat and power facility, or co-generation facility is located by more than one easement, public thoroughfare, or transportation or utility-owned right-of-way. "On-site generation facility" means a generation facility, including, but not limited to, a generation facility that produces Class I or Class II renewable energy, and equipment and services appurtenant to electric sales by such facility to the end use customer located on the property or on property contiguous to the property on which the end user is located.  An on-site generation facility shall not be considered a public utility.  The property of the end use customer and the property on which the on-site generation facility is located shall be considered contiguous if they are geographically located next to each other, but may be otherwise separated by an easement, public thoroughfare, transportation or utility-owned right-of-way, or if the end use customer is purchasing thermal energy services produced by the on-site generation facility, for use for heating or cooling, or both, regardless of whether the customer is located on property that is separated from the property on which the on-site generation facility is located by more than one easement, public thoroughfare, or transportation or utility-owned right-of-way. "Open access offshore wind transmission facility" means an open access transmission facility, located either in the Atlantic Ocean or offshore, used to facilitate the collection of offshore wind energy or its delivery to the electronic transmission system in this State. "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, trust, limited liability company, governmental entity, or other legal entity. "PJM Interconnection, L.L.C." or "PJM" means the privately-held, limited liability corporation that serves as a FERC-approved Regional Transmission Organization, or its successor, that manages the regional, high-voltage electricity grid serving all or parts of 13 states including New Jersey and the District of Columbia, operates the regional competitive wholesale electric market, manages the regional transmission planning process, and establishes systems and rules to ensure that the regional and in-State energy markets operate fairly and efficiently. "Preliminary assessment" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11b). "Preserved farmland" means land on which a development easement was conveyed to, or retained by, the State Agriculture Development Committee, a county agriculture development board, or a qualifying tax exempt nonprofit organization pursuant to the provisions of section 24 of P.L.1983, c.32 (C.4:1C-31), section 5 of P.L.1988, c.4 (C.4:1C-31.1), section 1 of P.L.1989, c.28 (C.4:1C-38), section 1 of P.L.1999, c.180 (C.4:1C-43.1), sections 37 through 40 of P.L.1999, c.152 (C.13:8C-37 through C.13:8C-40), or any other State law enacted for farmland preservation purposes. "Private aggregator" means a non-government aggregator that is a duly-organized business or non-profit organization authorized to do business in this State that enters into a contract with a duly licensed electric power supplier for the purchase of electric energy and capacity, or with a duly licensed gas supplier for the purchase of gas supply service, on behalf of multiple end-use customers by combining the loads of those customers. "Properly closed sanitary landfill facility" means a sanitary landfill facility, or a portion of a sanitary landfill facility, for which performance is complete with respect to all activities associated with the design, installation, purchase, or construction of all measures, structures, or equipment required by the Department of Environmental Protection, pursuant to law, in order to prevent, minimize, or monitor pollution or health hazards resulting from a sanitary landfill facility subsequent to the termination of operations at any portion thereof, including, but not necessarily limited to, the placement of earthen or vegetative cover, and the installation of methane gas vents or monitors and leachate monitoring wells or collection systems at the site of any sanitary landfill facility. "Public utility holding company" means: (1) any company that, directly or indirectly, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, 10 percent or more of the outstanding voting securities of an electric public utility or a gas public utility or of a company which is a public utility holding company by virtue of this definition, unless the Securities and Exchange Commission, or its successor, by order declares such company not to be a public utility holding company under the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, 15 U.S.C. s.79 et seq., or its successor; or (2) any person that the Securities and Exchange Commission, or its successor, determines, after notice and opportunity for hearing, directly or indirectly, to exercise, either alone or pursuant to an arrangement or understanding with one or more other persons, such a controlling influence over the management or policies of an electric public utility or a gas public utility or public utility holding company as to make it necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors or consumers that such person be subject to the obligations, duties, and liabilities imposed in the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935, 15 U.S.C. s.79 et seq., or its successor act. "Qualified offshore wind project" means a wind turbine electricity generation facility in the Atlantic Ocean and connected to the electric transmission system in this State, and includes the associated transmission-related interconnection facilities and equipment, and approved by the board pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2010, c.57 (C.48:3-87.1). "Registration program" means an administrative process developed by the board pursuant to subsection u. of section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87) that requires all owners of solar electric power generation facilities connected to the distribution system that intend to generate SRECs, to file with the board documents detailing the size, location, interconnection plan, land use, and other project information as required by the board. "Regulatory asset" means an asset recorded on the books of an electric public utility or gas public utility pursuant to the Statement of Financial Accounting Standards, No. 71, entitled "Accounting for the Effects of Certain Types of Regulation," or any successor standard and as deemed recoverable by the board. "Related competitive business segment of an electric public utility or gas public utility" means any business venture of an electric public utility or gas public utility including, but not limited to, functionally separate business units, joint ventures, and partnerships, that offers to provide or provides competitive services. "Related competitive business segment of a public utility holding company" means any business venture of a public utility holding company, including, but not limited to, functionally separate business units, joint ventures, and partnerships and subsidiaries, that offers to provide or provides competitive services, but does not include any related competitive business segments of an electric public utility or gas public utility. "Reliability pricing model" or "RPM" means PJM's capacity-market model, and its successors, that secures capacity on behalf of electric load serving entities to satisfy load obligations not satisfied through the output of electric generation facilities owned by those entities, or otherwise secured by those entities through bilateral contracts. "Renewable energy certificate" or "REC" means a certificate representing the environmental benefits or attributes of one megawatt-hour of generation from a generating facility that produces Class I or Class II renewable energy, but shall not include a solar renewable energy certificate or an offshore wind renewable energy certificate. "Resource clearing price" or "RCP" means the clearing price established for the applicable locational deliverability area by the base residual auction or incremental auction, as determined by the optimization algorithm for each auction, conducted by PJM as part of PJM's reliability pricing model. "Resource recovery facility" means a solid waste facility constructed and operated for the incineration of solid waste for energy production and the recovery of metals and other materials for reuse, which the Department of Environmental Protection has determined to be in compliance with current environmental standards, including, but not limited to, all applicable requirements of the federal "Clean Air Act" (42 U.S.C. s.7401 et seq.). "Restructuring related costs" means reasonably incurred costs directly related to the restructuring of the electric power industry, including the closure, sale, functional separation, and divestiture of generation and other competitive utility assets by a public utility, or the provision of competitive services as those costs are determined by the board, and which are not stranded costs as defined in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) but may include, but not be limited to, investments in management information systems, and which shall include expenses related to employees affected by restructuring which result in efficiencies and which result in benefits to ratepayers, such as training or retraining at the level equivalent to one year's training at a vocational or technical school or county community college, the provision of severance pay of two weeks of base pay for each year of full-time employment, and a maximum of 24 months' continued health care coverage.  Except as to expenses related to employees affected by restructuring, "restructuring related costs" shall not include going forward costs. "Retail choice" means the ability of retail customers to shop for electric generation or gas supply service from electric power or gas suppliers, or opt to receive basic generation service or basic gas service, and the ability of an electric power or gas supplier to offer electric generation service or gas supply service to retail customers, consistent with the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.). "Retail margin" means an amount, reflecting differences in prices that electric power suppliers and electric public utilities may charge in providing electric generation service and basic generation service, respectively, to retail customers, excluding residential customers, which the board may authorize to be charged to categories of basic generation service customers of electric public utilities in this State, other than residential customers, under the board's continuing regulation of basic generation service pursuant to sections 3 and 9 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-51 and 48:3-57), for the purpose of promoting a competitive retail market for the supply of electricity. "Sales representative" means a person employed by, acting on behalf of, or as an independent contractor for, an electric power supplier, gas supplier, broker, energy agent, marketer, or private aggregator who, by any means, solicits a potential residential customer for the provision of electric generation service or gas supply service. "Sanitary landfill facility" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1970, c.39 (C.13:1E-3). "School district" means a local or regional school district established pursuant to chapter 8 or chapter 13 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, a county special services school district established pursuant to article 8 of chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, a county vocational school district established pursuant to article 3 of chapter 54 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, and a district under full State intervention pursuant to P.L.1987, c.399 (C.18A:7A-34 et al.). "Shopping credit" means an amount deducted from the bill of an electric public utility customer to reflect the fact that the customer has switched to an electric power supplier and no longer takes basic generation service from the electric public utility. "Site investigation" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 3 of P.L.1976, c.141 (C.58:10-23.11b). "Small scale hydropower facility" means a facility located within this State that is connected to the distribution system, and that meets the requirements of, and has been certified by, a nationally recognized low-impact hydropower organization that has established low-impact hydropower certification criteria applicable to: (1) river flows; (2) water quality; (3) fish passage and protection; (4) watershed protection; (5) threatened and endangered species protection; (6) cultural resource protection; (7) recreation; and (8) facilities recommended for removal. "Social program" means a program implemented with board approval to provide assistance to a group of disadvantaged customers, to provide protection to consumers, or to accomplish a particular societal goal, and includes, but is not limited to, the winter moratorium program, utility practices concerning "bad debt" customers, low income assistance, deferred payment plans, weatherization programs, and late payment and deposit policies, but does not include any demand side management program or any environmental requirements or controls. "Societal benefits charge" means a charge imposed by an electric public utility, at a level determined by the board, pursuant to, and in accordance with, section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60). "Solar alternative compliance payment" or "SACP" means a payment of a certain dollar amount per megawatt hour (MWh) which an electric power supplier or provider may submit to the board in order to comply with the solar electric generation requirements under section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87). "Solar renewable energy certificate" or "SREC" means a certificate issued by the board or its designee, representing one megawatt hour (MWh) of solar energy that is generated by a facility connected to the distribution system in this State and has value based upon, and driven by, the energy market. "Solar renewable energy certificate II" or "SREC-II" means a transferable certificate, issued by the board or its designee pursuant to P.L.2021, c.169 (C.48:3-114 et al.), which is capable of counting towards the renewable energy portfolio standards of an electric power supplier or basic generation service provider in the State pursuant to section 38 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-87). "SREC-II program" means the program established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2021, c.169 (C.48:3-115) to distribute SREC-IIs. "SREC-II value per megawatt-hour" means the value, in dollars-per-megawatt-hour, assigned by the board to each solar electric power generation facility eligible to receive SREC-IIs, which is paid to the facility and which represents the environmental attributes of the facility. "Standard offer capacity agreement" or "SOCA" means a financially-settled transaction agreement, approved by board order, that provides for eligible generators to receive payments from the electric public utilities for a defined amount of electric capacity for a term to be determined by the board but not to exceed 15 years, and for such payments to be a fully non-bypassable charge, with such an order, once issued, being irrevocable. "Standard offer capacity price" or "SOCP" means the capacity price that is fixed for the term of the SOCA and which is the price to be received by eligible generators under a board-approved SOCA. "State entity" means a department, agency, or office of State government, a State university or college, or an authority created by the State. "Stranded cost" means the amount by which the net cost of an electric public utility's electric generating assets or electric power purchase commitments, as determined by the board consistent with the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.), exceeds the market value of those assets or contractual commitments in a competitive supply marketplace and the costs of buydowns or buyouts of power purchase contracts. "Stranded costs recovery order" means each order issued by the board in accordance with subsection c. of section 13 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-61) which sets forth the amount of stranded costs, if any, the board has determined an electric public utility is eligible to recover and collect in accordance with the standards set forth in section 13 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-61) and the recovery mechanisms therefor. "Telemarketer" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 2 of P.L.2003, c.76 (C.56:8-120). "Telemarketing sales call" means a telephone call made by a telemarketer to a potential residential customer as part of a plan, program, or campaign to encourage the customer to change the customer's electric power supplier or gas supplier.  A telephone call made to an existing customer of an electric power supplier, gas supplier, broker, energy agent, marketer, private aggregator, or sales representative, for the sole purpose of collecting on accounts or following up on contractual obligations, shall not be deemed a telemarketing sales call.  A telephone call made in response to an express written request of a customer shall not be deemed a telemarketing sales call. "Thermal efficiency" means the useful electric energy output of a facility, plus the useful thermal energy output of the facility, expressed as a percentage of the total energy input to the facility. "Transition bond charge" means a charge, expressed as an amount per kilowatt hour, that is authorized by and imposed on electric public utility ratepayers pursuant to a bondable stranded costs rate order, as modified at any time pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.). "Transition bonds" means bonds, notes, certificates of participation, beneficial interest, or other evidences of indebtedness or ownership issued pursuant to an indenture, contract, or other agreement of an electric public utility or a financing entity, the proceeds of which are used, directly or indirectly, to recover, finance or refinance bondable stranded costs and which are, directly or indirectly, secured by or payable from bondable transition property. References in P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-49 et al.) to principal, interest, and acquisition or redemption premium with respect to transition bonds which are issued in the form of certificates of participation or beneficial interest or other evidences of ownership shall refer to the comparable payments on such securities. "Transition period" means the period from August 1, 1999 through July 31, 2003. "Transmission and distribution system" means, with respect to an electric public utility, any facility or equipment that is used for the transmission, distribution, or delivery of electricity to the customers of the electric public utility including, but not limited to, the land, structures, meters, lines, switches, and all other appurtenances thereof and thereto, owned or controlled by the electric public utility within this State. "Universal service" means any service approved by the board with the purpose of assisting low-income residential customers in obtaining or retaining electric generation or delivery service. "Unsolicited advertisement" means any advertising claims of the commercial availability or quality of services provided by an electric power supplier, gas supplier, broker, energy agent, marketer, private aggregator, sales representative, or telemarketer which is transmitted to a potential customer without that customer's prior express invitation or permission. (cf:  P.L.2021, c.169, s.9) 4.    (New section)  a. Commencing on January 1 next following the date of enactment of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), and on January 1 of each year thereafter, the board shall provide a financial grant to the first advanced nuclear energy facility operating in the State, in order to offset the costs associated with the construction and operation of the advanced nuclear energy facility.  The grants made available under this subsection shall be known as advanced nuclear energy grants. b.    The first advanced nuclear energy facility operating in the State shall be entitled to receive an advanced nuclear energy grant, as authorized by subsection a. of this section in each year during the first 25 years of the facilitys operations. c.    The amount of each advanced nuclear energy grant authorized pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall equal $50 per megawatt-hour of electricity generated by the advanced nuclear energy facility in the preceding calendar year. 5.    (New section) a. In order to finance the advanced nuclear energy grants being made available pursuant to section 4 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the board shall annually assess a fee on each electric public utility operating in the State, which fee shall be proportional to, and shall reflect, the percentage of the States total electricity supply that was transmitted or distributed by the electric public utility to energy consumers in the State during the preceding calendar year.  The amount of the proportional fee to be assessed against each electric public utility, pursuant to this section, shall be annually determined by the board, and the total amount collected, each year, from the fees imposed shall be sufficient to cover the annual costs associated with the boards issuance of advanced nuclear energy credits, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    The board shall permit each electric public utility to recover some or all of the annual fee costs imposed on the utility, pursuant to subsection a. of this section, through the use of an advanced nuclear energy facilitation charge that shall be collected, by the electric public utility, as a non-bypassable charge imposed on all of the public utilitys customers. c.    The Advanced Nuclear Energy Grant Fund is established, as a non-lapsing fund, in the Board of Public Utilities.  The board shall credit to the fund, all fee moneys collected thereby through assessments imposed pursuant to subsection a. of this section, as well as any interest or earnings on moneys in the fund.  Moneys in the fund shall be used, by the board, exclusively for the purposes of financing the costs associated with the issuance of advanced nuclear energy grants, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 6.    This act shall take effect immediately and section 1 shall apply to privilege periods beginning after the date of enactment.